Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.08.040

Notice and investigation of application.

(1) The director shall notify the organizers when the application is complete and accepted for filing and all required fees and deposits have been paid.

(2) At the expense of the organizers, the director shall investigate the application and inquire into the identity and character of each proposed director, manager, officer, managing participant, and principal shareholder or participant.

(3) The financial statement of a proposed officer, director, manager, or managing participant is confidential and not subject to public disclosure under chapter 42.56 RCW.

[ 2019 c 389 s 8; 2014 c 37 s 325.]